District of Columbia statutes.
4-1305.07

Effect of failure to request a criminal records check.

(a)

If an individual described in § 4-1305.02(1), (2), or (3), or any adult residing in the home of an individual described in § 4-1305.02(1), (2), or (3), fails to request a criminal records check as required by this part, the Agency may deny approval or licensure.

(b)

If an individual described in § 4-1305.02(4), or any adult residing in the home of an individual described in § 4-1305.02(4), fails to request a criminal records check as required by this part, the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia may dismiss the petition for adoption.

(c)

If an individual described in § 4-1305.02(5), or an adult residing in the home of an individual described in § 4-1305.02(5), fails to request a criminal records check as required by this part, the Family Division of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia may refuse to place the child in the individual’s home, may remove the child from the home, or may take other appropriate action to ensure the health, welfare, and safety of the child.

Sept 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title V, § 507, formerly § 327
as added June 27, 2000, D.C. Law 13-136, § 201(f), 47 DCR 2850
Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-277, § 2(w), 48 DCR 2043
renumbered Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 22(a)(8), 53 DCR 6794
D.C. Law 13-277, in subsec. (a), substituted “Agency” for “Department”.
D.C. Law 16-191 renumbered the section.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see notes following § 4-1305.01.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-451, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9399).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Adoption and Safe Families Compliance Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-65, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5721).
For applicability of D.C. Law 13-277, see note following § 4-1303.01a.